Idaho, session 2025, H0180.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature
to promote reliable broadband and wireless connectivity in Idaho. Con-
nectivity is essential to public safety and a modern economy. Permitting
delays have hindered broadband deployment in the state despite historic in-
vestments in broadband. This legislation is intended to reduce delays and
increase deployment.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 65, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6540, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-6540. SITING OF TELECOMMUNICATIONS FACILITIES AND BROADBAND IN-
FRASTRUCTURE. (1) A city, county, or highway district shall approve, approve
with modification, or deny a siting application for a telecommunications or
cable service facility, for telecommunications or cable equipment, or for
broadband infrastructure within a reasonable period of time as defined in
subsection (7)(b) of this section.
(2) If the city, county, or highway district fails to approve, approve
with modification, or deny the application within a reasonable period of
time as defined in subsection (7)(b) of this section:
(a) For a siting application that requires a special use permit as
provided for in section 67-6512, Idaho Code, or a variance as provided
for in section 67-6516, Idaho Code, the governing board shall, within
thirty (30) days, hold a public hearing to approve, approve with modifi-
cation, or deny the application; and
(b) For a siting application that complies with the jurisdiction's ap-
plicable zoning ordinances and does not require a special use permit as
provided for in section 67-6512, Idaho Code, or a variance as provided
for in section 67-6516, Idaho Code, the application shall be deemed ap-
proved.
(3) If an application is incomplete, the city, county, or highway dis-
trict shall notify the applicant in writing within twenty-one (21) business
days of submittal of the application. The notice shall inform the appli-


cant of the specific requirements necessary to complete the application.
The provisions under subsection (2) of this section shall apply only if the
applicant satisfies the specific requirements of the notice and submits a
complete application within five (5) business days of receipt of the notice.
The tolling period for an application pursuant to this subsection shall be
from the day after the date when the siting authority notifies the applicant
the application is incomplete pursuant to this subsection until the date
when the applicant submits all the documents and information identified to
render the application complete.
(4) The reasonable period of time pursuant to subsection (7)(b) of this
section may be extended by mutual agreement between the applicant and the
city, county, or highway district.
(5) The automatic approval provisions of subsection (2) of this section
shall only apply if:
(a) The applicant provided all public notices required under applica-
ble law; and
(b) The applicant provided notice to the city, county, or highway dis-
trict that the reasonable period of time expired and that the applica-
tion is deemed approved pursuant to this section.
(6) Within thirty (30) days of the notice provided pursuant to subsec-
tion (5)(b) of this section, the city, county, or highway district may seek
judicial review regarding the application pursuant to the provisions of this
section.
(7) As used in this section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(a) "Broadband infrastructure" has the same meaning as that term is de-
fined in section 40-517, Idaho Code.
(b) "Reasonable period of time" for an application means:
(i) For broadband infrastructure permits, sixty (60) days;
(ii) To collocate a small wireless facility on existing equip-
ment, sixty (60) days;
(iii) To deploy a small wireless facility on new equipment, ninety
(90) days;
(iv) To collocate a facility other than a small wireless facility
on existing equipment, ninety (90) days; and
(v) To deploy a facility other than a small wireless facility on
new equipment, one hundred fifty (150) days.
(8) This section shall not apply to any request for modification of an
existing wireless tower or base station that does not substantially change
the physical dimensions of such tower or base station and that involves:
(a) Collocation of new transmission equipment;
(b) Removal of transmission equipment; or
(c) Replacement of transmission equipment.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, nothing in
this section limits or affects the authority of a city, county, or highway
district over decisions regarding the placement, construction, and modifi-
cation of a wireless telecommunications facility.
SECTION 3. That Section 61-538, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 4. That Chapter 5, Title 61, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 61-538, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
61-538. POLE ATTACHMENTS -- REGULATION. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Broadband" has the same meaning as that term is defined in section
40-517, Idaho Code.
(b) "Cable services company" means any individual, firm, partnership,
corporation, company, association, or joint-stock association, and
includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or personal representative
thereof, that transmits television signals for distribution to sub-
scribers of its services for a fee by means of wires or cables connecting
its distribution facilities with the customer's television receiver or
the customer's equipment connecting to the customer's receiver rather
than by transmission of the television signal through the air.
(c) "Pole attachment" means any wire or cable for the transmission of
a telecommunications service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153; broadband;
or cable service, as defined in section 50-3002(2), Idaho Code, and any
related device, apparatus, or auxiliary equipment, installed on any
pole or in any telegraph corporation, telephone corporation, or elec-
trical corporation or on a communications right-of-way, duct, conduit,
or other similar facilities owned or controlled, in whole or in part, by
one (1) or more public utilities.
(d) "Public utility" has the same meaning as that term is defined in
section 61-129, Idaho Code.
(2) The legislature hereby finds that many public utilities have,
through a course of conduct covering many years, made available space on and
in their poles, ducts, conduits, and other support structures for use by the
cable services industry for pole attachment service, and that the provision
of such pole attachment service by such public utilities is and has been a
public utility service.
(3) Whenever a public utility and a provider of a telecommunications
service or broadband or a cable services company are unable to agree on the
rates, terms, or conditions for pole attachments or the terms, conditions,
or cost of production of space needed for pole attachments, then the com-
mission shall establish and regulate the rates, terms, and conditions, and
cost of providing space needed for pole attachments to assure a public util-
ity the recovery of not less than all the additional costs of providing and
maintaining pole attachments and not more than the associated capital cost
and operating expenses of the public utility attributable to that portion of
the pole, duct, or conduit used for the pole attachment, including a share
of the required support and clearance space. In determining and fixing the
rates, terms, and conditions, the commission shall consider the interest of
the customers of the attaching provider of the telecommunications service,
broadband or cable services company, the public utility on which the attach-
ment is made, and the customers of the public utility.
(4) To the extent applicable, the procedures set forth in this title
shall apply under the provisions of this section.


(5) The commission shall establish rules, subject to legislative ap-
proval, relating to the timing of the permitting process for pole attach-
ments.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.